District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.88a

Authority over personnel.

The Attorney General shall be the personnel authority for the Office of the Attorney General. The Attorney General’s personnel authority shall be independent of the personnel authority of the Mayor established under §§  1-204.22 and 1-604.06, except that the personnel provisions applicable to the Mayor under Chapter 6 of this title [§ 1-601.01 et seq.], shall apply to the Attorney General’s exercise of this authority, unless specifically exempted by District statute.

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 108a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1032(b), 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).